Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1523XS (2) 91 je/js S.F. 502 Section 1. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 3 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 4 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and such other labor-services 5 duties assigned to the department or director. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.204, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The director, in consultation with the labor 9 commissioner, shall, at the time provided by law, make an 10 annual report to the governor setting forth in appropriate 11 form the business and expense of the division and department 12 under this subchapter for the preceding year, the number 13 of remedial actions taken under chapter 89A , the number of 14 disputes or violations processed by the division or department 15 and the disposition of the disputes or violations, and other 16 matters pertaining to the division or department under this 17 subchapter which that are of public interest, together with 18 recommendations for change or amendment of the laws in this 19 chapter and chapters 88 , 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 89B , 90A , 91A , 91C , 20 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and sections 85.67A and 85.68 , and the 21 recommendations, if any, shall be transmitted by the governor 22 to the first general assembly in session after the report is 23 filed. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 91F.1 Definitions. 25 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 26 requires: 27 1. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 28 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 29 2. âEmployeeâ means a natural person employed by an 30 employer. 31 3. âEmployerâ means a person that employs fifteen or more 32 employees for wages. 33 4. âPay scaleâ means the salary or hourly wage range that 34 the employer reasonably expects to pay for the position. 35 -1- LSB 1523XS (2) 91 je/js 1/ 3 S.F. 502 5. âPositionâ includes any position that may be filled 1 in this state by an employee, whether by in-person or remote 2 employment. 3 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 91F.2 Job posting ââ required salary 4 information. 5 1. An employer that announces, posts, publishes, or 6 otherwise makes known an advertisement, solicitation, or other 7 communication offering employment or seeking applicants for 8 employment shall include in the communication the pay scale 9 for each position for which employment is offered or for which 10 applicants are sought. The pay scale must be included in the 11 communication itself; a reference to another location where the 12 pay scale can be found is not sufficient. 13 2. An employer that engages a third party to announce, 14 post, publish, or otherwise make known an advertisement, 15 solicitation, or other communication offering employment or 16 seeking applicants for employment shall comply with subsection 17 1 in such communication or require that the third party do so. 18 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 91F.3 Civil penalty ââ procedures. 19 1. An employer that violates this chapter shall be subject 20 to a civil penalty of no less than one hundred dollars and no 21 more than ten thousand dollars per violation. 22 2. The director shall provide written notice to an 23 employer prior to imposition of a civil penalty under this 24 section. An employer may contest and seek judicial review of a 25 determination of the director under this chapter pursuant to 26 chapter 17A. 27 3. Upon a final determination of the director that an 28 employer violated this chapter and the conclusion of the period 29 for any appeals, the director shall bring an action in district 30 court to collect the penalties provided in this section. The 31 director shall remit any penalties collected to the treasurer 32 of state for deposit in the general fund. 33 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 91F.4 Enforcement ââ rules. 34 1. The director shall enforce this chapter. 35 -2- LSB 1523XS (2) 91 je/js 2/ 3 S.F. 502 2. The director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 1 administer this chapter. 2